Hawaii statutes.
§386A-4 Number, appointment, term.
(a) The board shall be composed of five directors, whose term of office shall
be five years, and each director shall hold office until the appointment and
qualification of the director's successor.

(b) The terms of the first five directors, who
shall be appointed by the governor, upon the fund becoming operational as
provided in section 386A-12, shall expire as follows:

(1) One for one year;

(2) One for two years;

(3) One for three years;

(4) One for four years; and

(5) One for five years.

Thereafter, each director shall be appointed for a
term of five years.

Upon the payment in full of the loan from the
State and all interest thereon, the unexpired terms of the appointed directors
shall expire, and the fund's policyholders shall be entitled to elect all of
the directors. Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, the selection
and composition of the board of directors as provided in this section shall be
deemed adequate to qualify the fund as a mutual insurer under chapter 431.

(c) A vacancy on the board shall be filled by
appointment of the governor in the case of vacancies in positions formerly
occupied by the governor's appointee, or by election by the fund's
policyholders in the case of positions formerly occupied by a director elected
by the fund's policyholders. The person appointed to fill a vacancy shall
serve for the remainder of the term of the person's predecessor.

(d) Each director shall receive necessary
traveling and board expenses incurred in the performance of duty as a director
and a fee of $100 for each day of actual attendance at board meetings, but not
to exceed $500 a month.

(e) Within one year after appointment, each
director shall be a policyholder or an employee of a policyholder of the fund
and shall continue in such status during the director's term of office.

No person who has any interest as a
stockholder, employee, attorney, or contractor of a competing insurance carrier
shall be a director.

(f) The board shall determine the content and
sale of workers' compensation insurance policies.

(g) The board shall discharge its duties:

(1) In accordance with the fund's purpose;

(2) With the care, skill, prudence, and diligence
under the circumstances that a prudent director, acting in a like capacity and
familiar with such matters would use in conducting a similar enterprise and
purpose;

(3) By diversifying the fund's investments to
minimize the risk of losses, unless it is prudent not to do so;

(4) In accordance with governing legal documents;

(5) By having an annual audit of the fund by an
independent certified public accountant and by making copies of such audit
available to the governor and the state legislature;

(6) By securing fidelity bonds for the directors and
in its discretion for other agents dealing with the fund's assets at the fund's
expense;

(7) By purchasing liability insurance for errors and
omissions for the board, each director, and any other fiduciary employed or
contracted by the fund to cover liability or losses caused by the act or
omission of a fiduciary;

(8) By maintaining proper books of accounts and
records of the fund's administration;

(9) By carrying out the reporting and disclosure
requirements required by law; and

(10) By determining an actuarially responsible
schedule of premium rates with consideration of the fund's investment income or
refunds, or both, to policyholders.

(h) Except as otherwise provided by law, the
fund may:

(1) Transact workers' compensation insurance policies
required or authorized by state law to the same extent as any other insurer.

(A) The fund may insure Hawaii employers
against their liability for compensation or damages for injury or death under
the United States Longshoremen's and Harbor Workers' Compensation Act or other
federal or maritime laws like any other private insurer;

(B) The fund may insure an out-of-state
employer against its liability for damages under the State's law for bodily
injury or death occurring within the State of Hawaii if the fund also sold
workers' compensation insurance to the employer as an in-state employer;

(2) Allocate fiduciary responsibilities among the
directors and designate other persons to carry out fiduciary responsibilities;

(3) Collect, receive, hold, and disburse all money
payable to or by the fund;

(4) Deposit the fund's money in banks or depositories
selected by the board. Withdrawals from such banks or depositories shall be
made or authorized only upon the signatures of at least two persons approved by
the board;

(5) Pay money from the fund to effectuate the fund's
purpose and administration, including costs incurred to establish the fund;

(6) Employ persons to administer the fund, including,
but not limited to, legal counsel, accountants, insurance consultants, administrators,
actuaries, investment managers, adjustors, and any other expert and clerical
employees and pay compensation and expenses in connection therewith, without
the restrictions or requirements affecting public officers and employees under
title 7;

(7) By August 1, 1986, appoint an administrator,
establish an administration office, and secure real and personal property to
maintain such office to administer the fund;

(8) Provide for the fund's administration, jointly,
with other similar funds or similar purposes, to reduce expenses of
administration;

(9) Select the department of budget and finance or
other organization to serve as custodial trustee to collect, receive, hold, or
disburse money payable to or by the fund;

(10) Invest the fund's principal and income without
distinction between principal and income and keep the fund's assets invested in
real or personal property or other securities. The board may retain cash
temporarily awaiting investment or to meet contemplated payments without liability
for interest thereon.

The board may manage the fund's assets,
except to the extent that such authority to manage the fund's assets is
delegated to other qualified investment managers.

The board may appoint investment
managers to manage, acquire, or dispose of any of the fund's assets. An
investment manager may be designated as an "investment agent".

An investment manager is any fiduciary,
who has been designated by the board to manage, acquire, or dispose of the
fund's assets, a bank as defined by law, or an insurance company qualified to
perform services under laws of more than one state. Such investment manager
shall acknowledge in writing that it is a fiduciary under the fund.

The board may, but not by way of
limitation:

(A) Sell the fund's securities. No purchaser
of the fund's securities is bound to see to the application of the purchase
money or inquire as to the validity of such sale;

(B) Vote in behalf of any stocks, bonds, or
securities of any corporation or issuer held in the fund or request any action
to such corporation or issuer. The board may give general or special proxies
or powers of attorney with or without powers of substitution;

(C) Participate in reorganizations,
recapitalizations, consolidations, mergers, and similar transactions for
stocks, bonds, or other securities of any corporation which are held in the
fund and may accept and retain any property received thereunder for the fund.
The board may exercise any subscription rights and conversion privileges for the
fund's stocks or securities;

(D) Compromise, compound, and settle any debt
or obligation due to or from the fund. The board may reduce the amount of
principal and interest, damages, and costs of collection in settling such
debts;

(E) Cause securities held by it to be
registered in its own name or in the name of a nominee without indicating that
such securities are held in the fiduciary capacity and to hold any securities
in bearer form. The fund's records, however, shall show that such investments are
part of the fund;

(F) In order to expedite the purchase and
sale of securities, the board may delegate their investment powers to
investment managers of the fund. The purchase or sale of any securities by
such managers shall be in the name selected by the board. The authority of
such managers to purchase or sell such securities for the fund shall be
evidenced by written authority executed by the fund's administrator. The board
shall require such managers to keep them currently informed as to the nature
and amount of the investments made for the fund by them. The board may enter
into appropriate agreements with such managers setting forth their investment
powers and limitations. The board may terminate the services of such
managers. Such managers shall be subject to the board's instructions;

(11) Borrow money from any source and secure repayment
thereof by pledging any of the fund's assets;

(12) Buy, sell, exchange, lease, convey, and otherwise
acquire or dispose of any real or personal property under proper terms and sign
and deliver any necessary instrument of conveyances or transfer, or both, in
connection therewith;

(13) Enter into any agreement to carry out this
chapter and to administer the fund;

(14) Pay taxes or assessments assessed against the
fund;

(15) Require any employer or policyholder or any
employee to furnish the board with such information necessary for the fund's
administration;

(16) Delegate its authority to the administrator or
any authorized representative to maintain any legal proceedings necessary to
protect the fund or the directors or to secure payment due to the fund. In
connection therewith the board or the administrator or their representative may
compromise, settle, or release claims on behalf of or against the fund or the
board;

(17) Promote safety programs to employer clients,
including, but not limited to, the following activities:

(A) Analysis of reports of industrial
accidents of employer clients to help determine the cause of these accidents;

(B) Conduct of studies for the purpose of
risk and hazard identification and assessment by safety and medical
professionals;

(C) Conduct of educational programs designed
to prevent frequently recurring industrial accidents; and

(D) Inspection of work sites and investigation
of unsafe working conditions to promote job safety and elimination of hazards;

(18) Provide the terms and conditions of an insurance
policy;

(19) Provide that any written instrument be executed
for the fund by the administrator or the administrator's agent;

(20) Pay for reasonable expenses to educate the
directors and fund personnel, including but not limited to traveling, room and
board, and tuition expenses. [L 1985, c 296, pt of §11; am L 1989, c 277, §§5,
6]

Revision Note

In subsection (h)(1)(B), (2) to (9), (10)(A) to (F), (11) to
(16), (17)(D), and (18) to (19), punctuation changed pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next